Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-816
Fees prohibited.

No fee shall be charged by any officer for filing the petition, nor shall any fee be charged by any officer for the performance of any duty pursuant to the provisions of sections 42-801 to 42-823.

Laws 1965, c. 228, § 16, p. 660.